New York, session 2025-2026, S516.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivisions 1 and 2 of section 398-d of the vehicle and 2 traffic law, subdivision 1 as amended by chapter 161 of the laws of 1996 3 and subdivision 2 as amended by chapter 173 of the laws of 1990, are 4 amended and a new subdivision 2-a is added to read as follows: 5 1. All work done by a motor vehicle repair shop shall be recorded on 6 an invoice and shall describe all service work done and parts supplied. 7 If any used parts are supplied, the invoice shall clearly state that 8 fact. If any component system installed is composed of new and used 9 parts, such invoice shall clearly state that fact. If any body parts are 10 supplied to a vehicle with a gross vehicle weight not in excess of eigh- 11 teen thousand pounds, the invoice shall clearly state whether such parts 12 were manufactured as original equipment parts for the vehicle, or were 13 manufactured as non-original replacement parts or are used parts. If 14 any parts or labor supplied are covered under shop warranty, such 15 invoice shall clearly state that fact, and a copy of the work order 16 information and shop warranty of such parts or labor shall be displayed 17 on such invoice. One copy of the invoice shall be given to the customer EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02196-04-6 S. 516--B 2 1 and one copy shall be retained by the motor vehicle repair shop. For the 2 purposes of insuring that the repairs described on the work invoice have 3 been performed, every customer and [his] such customer's representative 4 or a representative of an insurance company where such company has paid 5 or is liable to pay a claim for damage to such customer's motor vehicle 6 shall have a right to inspect the repaired motor vehicle. Such right of 7 inspection shall also include the right to inspect all replaced parts 8 and components thereof, except warranty or exchange parts. Provided, 9 however, the exception for warranty or exchange parts from the right of 10 inspection shall not apply to replacement inflatable restraint systems. 11 Any such inspection by an insurer shall be made in a manner consistent 12 with the requirements of sections two thousand six hundred one and three 13 thousand four hundred eleven of the insurance law. The motor vehicle 14 repair shop shall make available to the customer, upon timely written 15 demand, or for such work authorized over the telephone, shall keep until 16 the customer's motor vehicle is retrieved, all replaced parts, compo- 17 nents or equipment excepting any parts, components or equipment normally 18 sold on an exchange basis or subject to a warranty. 19 2. [Upon the request of any customer, a] A motor vehicle repair shop 20 shall make an estimate in writing of the parts and labor necessary for a 21 specific job and shall not charge for work done or parts supplied [in 22 excess of the estimate] without the consent of such customer. The motor 23 vehicle repair shop may charge a reasonable fee for making an estimate. 24 If any body parts are included in the estimate for a vehicle with a 25 gross vehicle weight not in excess of eighteen thousand pounds, the 26 estimate shall clearly state whether such parts were manufactured as 27 original equipment parts for the vehicle, or were manufactured as non- 28 original replacement parts or are used parts. 29 2-a. A violation of subdivision one or two of this section shall be 30 punishable by a fine of five hundred dollars for a first violation, one 31 thousand dollars for a second violation, and one thousand five hundred 32 dollars for a third and any subsequent violation. 33 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 34 have become a law.